West Virginia, session 2026, HB4825.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. GENERAL AND SPECIFIC POWERS, DUTIES AND ALLIED RELATIONS OF MUNICIPALITIES, GOVERNING BODIES AND MUNICIPAL OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES; SUITS AGAINST MUNICIPALITIES. §8-12-28. Authorizing municipalities to place signage. Municipalities in this state are authorized to place signage on state roads within their municipal jurisdiction and boundaries. Such signs may include, but are not limited to, speed warning signs or radar-based signs that inform the driver of their speed.